src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_litter_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - litter: # 1B
    litter+N+Sg+Nom: litter
    litter+N+Sg+Gen: litter
    litter+N+Sg+Acc: litter
    litter+N+Sg+Ill: litterân
    litter+N+Sg+Loc: litterist
    litter+N+Sg+Com: litteráin
    litter+N+Sg+Abe: litterttáá
    litter+N+Ess:    litterin
    litter+N+Par:    litterid
    litter+N+Pl+Nom: littereh
    litter+N+Pl+Gen: litterij
    litter+N+Pl+Acc: litterijd
    litter+N+Pl+Ill: litteráid
    litter+N+Pl+Loc: litterijn
    litter+N+Pl+Com: [litterijguin, litterijgijn]
    litter+N+Pl+Abe: litterijttáá

  Noun - miinut: # the othe miinut goes to pottáák-yaml.
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Nom: miinut
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Gen: miinut
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Acc: miinut
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Ill: miinutân
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Loc: miinutist
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Com: miinutáin
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Abe: miinuttáá
    miinut+v2+N+Ess:    miinutin
    miinut+v2+N+Par:    miinutid
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Nom: miinuteh
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Gen: miinutij
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Acc: miinutijd
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Ill: miinutáid
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Loc: miinutijn
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Com: [miinutijguin, miinutijgijn]
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Abe: miinutijttáá

  Noun - myenster: # 1B
    myenster+N+Sg+Nom: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Gen: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Acc: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Ill: myensterân
    myenster+N+Sg+Loc: myensterist
    myenster+N+Sg+Com: myensteráin
    myenster+N+Sg+Abe: myensterttáá
    myenster+N+Ess:    myensterin
    myenster+N+Par:    myensterid
    myenster+N+Pl+Nom: myenstereh
    myenster+N+Pl+Gen: myensterij
    myenster+N+Pl+Acc: myensterijd
    myenster+N+Pl+Ill: myensteráid
    myenster+N+Pl+Loc: myensterijn
    myenster+N+Pl+Com: [myensterijguin, myensterijgijn]
    myenster+N+Pl+Abe: myensterijttáá

  Noun - säplig: # 1A
    säplig+N+Sg+Nom: säplig
    säplig+N+Sg+Gen: säplig
    säplig+N+Sg+Acc: säplig
    säplig+N+Sg+Ill: säpligân
    säplig+N+Sg+Loc: säpligist
    säplig+N+Sg+Com: säpligáin
    säplig+N+Sg+Abe: säpligttáá
    säplig+N+Ess: säpligin
    säplig+N+Par: säpligid
    säplig+N+Pl+Nom: säpligeh
    säplig+N+Pl+Gen: säpligij
    säplig+N+Pl+Acc: säpligijd
    säplig+N+Pl+Ill: säpligáid
    säplig+N+Pl+Loc: säpligijn
    säplig+N+Pl+Com: [säpligijguin, säpligijgijn]
    säplig+N+Pl+Abe: säpligijttáá

  Noun - taldrik: # 1A
    taldrik+N+Sg+Nom: taldrik
    taldrik+N+Sg+Gen: taldrik
    taldrik+N+Sg+Acc: taldrik
    taldrik+N+Sg+Ill: taldrikân
    taldrik+N+Sg+Loc: taldrikist
    taldrik+N+Sg+Com: taldrikáin
    taldrik+N+Sg+Abe: taldrikttáá
    taldrik+N+Ess: taldrikin
    taldrik+N+Par: taldrikid
    taldrik+N+Pl+Nom: taldrikeh
    taldrik+N+Pl+Gen: taldrikij
    taldrik+N+Pl+Acc: taldrikijd
    taldrik+N+Pl+Ill: taldrikáid
    taldrik+N+Pl+Loc: taldrikijn
    taldrik+N+Pl+Com: [taldrikijguin, taldrikijgijn]
    taldrik+N+Pl+Abe: taldrikijttáá

  Noun - njuámmil: # 1A
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Nom: njuámmil
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Gen: njuámmil
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Acc: njuámmil
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Ill: njuámmilân
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Loc: njuámmilist
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Com: njuámmiláin
    njuámmil+N+Sg+Abe: njuámmilttáá
    njuámmil+N+Ess: njuámmilin
    njuámmil+N+Par: njuámmilid
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Nom: njuámmileh
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Gen: njuámmilij
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Acc: njuámmilijd
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Ill: njuámmiláid
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Loc: njuámmilijn
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Com: [njuámmilijguin, njuámmilijgijn]
    njuámmil+N+Pl+Abe: njuámmilijttáá

  Noun - tiiger: # 1A
    tiiger+N+Sg+Nom: tiiger
    tiiger+N+Sg+Gen: tiiger
    tiiger+N+Sg+Acc: tiiger
    tiiger+N+Sg+Ill: tiigerân
    tiiger+N+Sg+Loc: tiigerist
    tiiger+N+Sg+Com: tiigeráin
    tiiger+N+Sg+Abe: tiigerttáá
    tiiger+N+Ess: tiigerin
    tiiger+N+Par: tiigerid
    tiiger+N+Pl+Nom: tiigereh
    tiiger+N+Pl+Gen: tiigerij
    tiiger+N+Pl+Acc: tiigerijd
    tiiger+N+Pl+Ill: tiigeráid
    tiiger+N+Pl+Loc: tiigerijn
    tiiger+N+Pl+Com: [tiigerijguin, tiigerijgijn]
    tiiger+N+Pl+Abe: tiigerijttáá
